Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1635.02
Annexation; when effective; trustees; duties; special assessments prohibited.

The merger shall be effective thirty days after the effective date of the ordinance annexing the territory within the road improvement district. If the validity of the ordinance annexing the territory is challenged by a proceeding in a court of competent jurisdiction, the effective date of the merger shall be thirty days after the final determination of the validity of the ordinance. The trustees of the road improvement district shall continue in possession and conduct the affairs of the district until the effective date of the merger, but shall not during such period levy any special assessments after the effective date of annexation.

Laws 2018, LB130, § 12.